Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.281

Waiver—Denial.

Upon determining that a licensed escrow agent is to be denied a waiver of the errors and omissions policy requirements of RCW 18.44.201, the director shall within thirty days of the denial of an escrow agent's request for same, provide to the escrow agent a written explanation of the reasons for the director's decision to deny the requested waiver.

[ 2000 c 171 s 15; 1987 c 471 s 8. Formerly RCW 18.44.395.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1987 c 471: See notes following RCW 18.44.231.